North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-15 Cooperative Associations

10-15-01.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise, the term:

“Association” includes both cooperatives and foreign cooperatives.

“Cooperative” means an association incorporated under this chapter.

“Corporation” means all corporations not associations.

“Electronic” means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.

“Electronic communication” means any form of communication, not directly involving the physical transmission of paper that:

Creates a record that may be retained, retrieved, and reviewed by a recipient of the communication; and

May be directly reproduced in paper form by the recipient through an automated process.

“Electronic record” means a record created, generated, sent, communicated, received, or stored by electronic means.

“Electronic signature” means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with a record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the record.

“Filed with the secretary of state” means, except as otherwise permitted by law or rule:

That a document meeting the applicable requirements of this chapter together with the fees provided in section 10-15-54 was delivered or communicated to the secretary of state by a method or medium of communication acceptable by the secretary of state and was determined by the secretary of state to conform to law.

That the secretary of state shall then:

Record the actual date on which the document is filed, and if different, the effective date of filing; and

Record the document in the office of the secretary of state.

“Foreign cooperative” means an association incorporated under a cooperative law of another state which has members residing within this state and which is operating on the following cooperative bases:

Either no member of the foreign cooperative who is an individual is allowed more than one vote because of the amount of stock or membership capital the member owns therein, or the foreign cooperative does not pay dividends on stock or membership capital in excess of eight percent per annum.

The foreign cooperative shall not deal in the products of or for nonmembers to an amount greater in value than such as are handled by it for members.

The foreign cooperative distributes its proceeds according to either the law governing cooperatives of this state or the law of the state of its incorporation.

“Member” means a person who has been qualified and accepted for membership in an association.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1501; 2005, ch. 99, § 1.

Cross-References.

Condominium property, see N.D.C.C. ch. 47-04.1.

Cooperative grazing associations, see N.D.C.C. ch. 36-08.

Credit unions, see N.D.C.C. ch. 6-06.

Electric cooperatives, see N.D.C.C. ch. 10-13.

Mutual aid cooperatives, see N.D.C.C. ch. 10-12.

Telephone cooperatives, see N.D.C.C. §§ 49-21-01, 49-21-13.1.

10-15-01.1.
Legal recognition of electronic records and electronic signatures.

For purposes of this chapter:

A record or signature may not be denied legal effect or enforceability solely because it is in electronic form;

A contract may not be denied legal effect or enforceability solely because an electronic record was used in its formation;

If a provision requires a record to be in writing, then an electronic record satisfies the requirement; and

If a provision requires a signature, then an electronic signature satisfies the requirement.

The provisions of this chapter relating to electronic records or electronic transactions do not limit or supersede any provision of chapter 9-16.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 99, § 2.

10-15-02.
Purposes.

Cooperatives may be organized under this chapter for any lawful purpose except banking and insurance, but subject to statutes relating to the organization or operation of specified kinds of corporations or associations.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1502; S.L. 1983, ch. 132, § 1.

10-15-03.
General powers.

Unless otherwise provided by its articles, a cooperative may:

Exist perpetually.

Sue and be sued.

Have a seal.

Make contracts, incur liabilities, and borrow money; issue certificates representing indebtedness, or representing equity interests in its assets; acquire property; and dispose of, mortgage, pledge, lease, or otherwise use in any manner any of its property, or any interest therein, wherever situated.

Invest its funds, lend money for its purposes, and hold any property as security for repayment.

Conduct its business and affairs and have offices and exercise its powers in the United States or in any foreign country.

Elect officers and appoint agents, define their duties, and fix their compensation.

Make and alter bylaws, consistent with its articles and the laws of this state, for the administration and regulation of its affairs.

Make donations for charitable, scientific, educational, or religious purposes.

Indemnify any present or former director, officer, agent, or manager against actual expenses necessarily incurred in defense of any proceeding in which the person is a party because the person is or was a director, officer, agent, or manager. This subsection does not apply to those proceedings in which the person is adjudged liable for gross or willful negligence or gross or willful misconduct in the performance of duty. Such indemnification is not exclusive of other rights to which the person may be entitled. For purposes of this subsection, “manager” means the person who was the most responsible for carrying out the policies and directives of the officers or the board of directors when the act or omission complained of occurred.

Cease its activities and surrender its franchise.

Exercise all powers necessary or convenient to effect its purposes.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1503; S.L. 1987, ch. 137, § 2.

10-15-04.
Incorporators.

Five or more adults, one of whom must be a resident, may form a cooperative by signing, acknowledging, and filing articles of association.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1504; S.L. 1967, ch. 98, § 2.

10-15-05.
Articles — Provisions.

The articles of association shall set forth:

The name of the cooperative.

The period of existence, unless perpetual. Cooperatives now organized under the provisions of chapter 4-07 or 10-15 are granted perpetual existence irrespective of the period of existence set forth in articles of incorporation. Any such cooperative may nevertheless amend its articles to provide for a limited period of existence.

The purposes for which organized. It is sufficient to state that the cooperative may engage in any activity within the purposes for which cooperatives may be organized, and all such activities shall then be deemed within its purposes, subject to express limitations.

Whether the cooperative is organized with or without capital stock.

The designation of classes of members, if more than one.

The number and par value of shares of each authorized class of stock. If more than one class is authorized, the designation, preferences, limitations, and relative rights of each class shall also be set forth.

Which classes of stock are membership stock.

As to each class of stock, the rate of dividend, or that the rate of dividend may be fixed by the board, or that no dividend will be paid.

Any reservation of a right to acquire or recall any stock.

The basis of distribution of assets in the event of liquidation.

The complete address where the cooperative’s principal office is to be located.

If the address of the principal office is not located in North Dakota, the name and complete address in this state of the cooperative’s registered agent.

The name and address of each incorporator.

The names and addresses of at least five incorporators who will act as the temporary board.

The effective date of the cooperative if a later date than that on which the certificate of association is issued by the secretary of state. A later effective date may not be later than ninety days after the date on which the certificate of association is issued.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1505; S.L. 1997, ch. 102, § 1; 1999, ch. 96, § 1; 2013, ch. 89, § 2.

Note.

Chapter 4-07, referred to in subdivision 2, was repealed by S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 2.

10-15-06.
Articles — Scope.

It is not necessary to set forth in the articles of association any of the powers granted by this chapter. The articles may include additional provisions, consistent with law, including provisions which are required or permitted to be set forth in the bylaws. Any provision required or permitted in the bylaws has equal force and effect if stated in the articles. Whenever a provision of the articles is inconsistent with a bylaw, the articles control.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1506.

10-15-07.
Filing articles of association — Cooperative existence.

An original of the articles of association, duly signed and acknowledged, must be delivered to the secretary of state for filing. The legal corporate existence of a cooperative begins when the certificate of association is issued by the secretary of state or on a later date as specified in the articles of association. The secretary of state shall stamp on the articles of association the date of filing and provide to the cooperative a certificate of the filing.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1507; S.L. 1967, ch. 98, § 3; 1991, ch. 98, § 1; 1997, ch. 102, § 2.

10-15-08.
Certificate of association.

Upon receipt of the articles of association and payment of the required fees, the secretary of state shall issue a certificate of association. The certificate of association shall be conclusive evidence, except as against the state in a proceeding to cancel or revoke such certificate, that all conditions precedent to corporate existence have been met.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1508.

10-15-08.1.
Cooperative name. [Contingent expiration date – See note]

The cooperative name:

Must be expressed in letters or characters used in the English language as those letters or characters appear in the American standard code for information interchange (ASCII) table.

May contain the word “corporation” or “incorporated” or an abbreviation of either of those words.

May not contain a word or phrase that indicates or implies that it is organized for a purpose other than one or more business purposes for which a cooperative association may be organized under this chapter.

May not be the same as, or deceptively similar to, the name, whether foreign and authorized to do business in this state, or domestic, unless there is filed with the articles of association of a domestic cooperative or the application for authority of a foreign cooperative, a record in compliance with subsection 2 of:

Another cooperative association;

A corporation;

A limited liability company;

A limited liability partnership;

A limited partnership;

A limited liability limited partnership;

A name the right to which is, at the time of organization, in some manner reserved;

A fictitious name registered with the secretary of state as provided in chapter 45-11;

A trade name registered with the secretary of state as provided in chapter 47-25; or

A trademark or service mark registered in the manner provided in chapter 47-22.

If the secretary of state determines a cooperative name is deceptively similar to another name for purposes of this chapter, then the cooperative name may not be used unless there is filed with the articles of association or application for authority:

A written consent to use the name obtained from the domestic or foreign corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, limited liability limited partnership, or limited partnership authorized to do business in this state having a deceptively similar name, or the holder of a reserved name, registered trade name, fictitious name, or trademark or service mark; or

A certified copy of a judgment of a court in this state establishing the prior right of the applicant to the use of the name in this state.

The secretary of state shall determine whether a cooperative name is deceptively similar to another name for purposes of this chapter.

This section and section 10-15-08.2 do not:

Abrogate or limit:

The law of unfair competition or unfair practices;

Chapter 47-25;

The laws of the United States with respect to the right to acquire and protect copyrights, trade names, trademarks, service names, and service marks; or

Any other rights to the exclusive use of names or symbols; or

Derogate the common law or the principles of equity.

A cooperative that is involuntarily dissolved by the secretary of state under section 10-15-53.2 may reacquire the right to use that name by reinstating the cooperative within the time provided in section 10-15-53.3 or by refiling articles of association, unless the name has been adopted for use or reserved by another person, in which case the filing must be rejected unless the filing is accompanied by a written consent or judgment as provided in subdivision d of subsection 1. A cooperative that is unable to reacquire the use of its name shall adopt a new name that complies with this section.

A cooperative that files its articles of association with an effective date later than the date of filing as provided in section 10-15-07 shall maintain the right to the name until the effective date.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 102, § 3; 2011, ch. 87, § 3; 2015, ch. 86, § 3, effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

This section is effective upon receipt by the legislative council of the certification by the secretary of state attesting that all necessary administrative rules and information technology components and systems are ready for implementation of this Act.

10-15-08.1.
Cooperative name. [Contingent effective date – See note]

The cooperative name:

Must be expressed in letters or characters used in the English language as those letters or characters appear in the American standard code for information interchange (ASCII) table.

May contain the word “corporation” or “incorporated” or an abbreviation of either of those words.

May not contain a word or phrase indicating or implying it is organized for a purpose other than one or more business purposes for which a cooperative association may be organized under this chapter.

Must be distinguishable in the records of the secretary of state from the name, whether foreign and authorized to do business in this state, or domestic, unless there is filed with the articles of association of a domestic cooperative or the application for authority of a foreign cooperative, a record in compliance with subsection 2 of:

Another cooperative association;

A corporation;

A limited liability company;

A limited liability partnership;

A limited partnership;

A limited liability limited partnership;

A name the right to which is, at the time of organization, in some manner reserved;

A fictitious name registered with the secretary of state as provided in chapter 45-11;

A trade name registered with the secretary of state as provided in chapter 47-25; or

A trademark or service mark registered in the manner provided in chapter 47-22.

If the secretary of state determines a cooperative name is indistinguishable from another name for purposes of this chapter, then the cooperative name may not be used unless there is filed with the articles of association or application for authority:

A written consent to use the name obtained from the domestic or foreign corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, limited liability limited partnership, or limited partnership authorized to do business in this state having an indistinguishable name, or the holder of a reserved name, registered trade name, fictitious name, or trademark or service mark; or

A certified copy of a judgment of a court in this state establishing the prior right of the applicant to the use of the name in this state.

The secretary of state shall determine whether a cooperative name is distinguishable in the secretary of state’s records from another name for purposes of this chapter and may adopt rules reasonable or necessary for making these determinations.

This section and section 10-15-08.2 do not:

Abrogate or limit:

The law of unfair competition or unfair practices;

Chapter 47-25;

The laws of the United States with respect to the right to acquire and protect copyrights, trade names, trademarks, service names, and service marks; or

Any other rights to the exclusive use of names or symbols; or

Derogate the common law or the principles of equity.

A cooperative that is involuntarily dissolved by the secretary of state under section 10-15-53.2 may reacquire the right to use that name by reinstating the cooperative within the time provided in section 10-15-53.3 or by refiling articles of association, unless the name has been adopted for use or reserved by another person, in which case the filing must be rejected unless the filing is accompanied by a written consent or judgment as provided in subsection 2. A cooperative that is unable to reacquire the use of its name shall adopt a new name that complies with this section.

A cooperative that files its articles of association with an effective date later than the date of filing as provided in section 10-15-07 shall maintain the right to the name until the effective date.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 102, § 3; 2011, ch. 87, § 3; contingently amended by 2015, ch. 86, § 3, effective August 1, 2015; contingently amended by 2019, ch. 93, § 1.

10-15-08.2.
Reserved name.

The exclusive right to the use of a name otherwise permitted by section 10-15-08.1 may be reserved by any person.

The reservation must be made by filing with the secretary of state a request that the name be reserved, together with the fees provided in section 10-15-54. If the name is available for use by the applicant, the secretary of state shall reserve the name for the exclusive use of the applicant for a period of twelve months. The reservation may be renewed for successive twelve-month periods.

The right to the exclusive use of a cooperative name reserved under this section may be transferred to another person by or on behalf of the applicant for whom the name was reserved by filing with the secretary of state a notice of the transfer and specifying the name and address of the transferee, together with the fees provided in section 10-15-54.

The right to the exclusive use of a cooperative name reserved under this section may be canceled by or on behalf of the applicant for whom the name was reserved by filing with the secretary of state a notice of the cancellation, with the fees provided in section 10-15-54.

The secretary of state may accept for filing a legible facsimile copy of the signed original of any request for a reserved name which is the same size as the original document and which meets all other requirements of this section.

The secretary of state may destroy all reserved name requests and the reserved name requests index one year after expiration.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 102, § 4.

10-15-09.
Organization meetings — Temporary board.

After articles have been filed, an organization meeting of the temporary board shall be held at the call of a majority of the incorporators or of a majority of the temporary directors for the adoption of bylaws, election of temporary officers, and transaction of other business.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1509; S.L. 1967, ch. 98, § 4.

10-15-10.
Members’ first meeting.

The first meeting of the members shall be called by the temporary president or a majority of the temporary directors. Such meeting shall be held as soon as reasonably possible after the organization meeting of the temporary board but not later than six months after filing the articles. Failure to hold such meeting within the time specified does not affect the validity of organization.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1510; S.L. 1967, ch. 98, § 5.

10-15-11.
Bylaws.

The initial bylaws of a cooperative may be adopted by the temporary board. Thereafter, bylaws may be adopted and amended only by the members, unless the members adopt a bylaw that permits the board to make and amend specified bylaws. Any bylaw adopted or amended by the board shall be reported at the next regular member meeting. Any such bylaw shall be at any time subject to amendment or repeal by the members. Unless the bylaws provide otherwise, any bylaw may be adopted, amended, or repealed by a majority of the members present at a meeting, provided that the members voting must be sufficient in number to constitute a quorum as provided in this chapter or the bylaws.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1511.

Collateral References.

Validity and enforceability of bylaw amendment reducing benefits available to members, 61 A.L.R.3d 976.

10-15-12.
Principal office — Registered agent.

A cooperative shall maintain in this state either:

Its principal office; or

A registered agent as provided in chapter 10-01.1 and, if a noncommercial registered agent, the address of the registered office in this state.

The board may establish a registered agent and address of the registered agent or change the location of the principal office by causing a statement in writing to be filed as an amendment to the articles as provided in section 10-15-53 or, if only a change of address of the principal office is required, an amendment need not be filed; however, the change of address of the principal office must then be reported on the annual report filed after the change. If a written statement is filed, the statement shall set forth the name of the cooperative, the name and address of the registered agent as established, and the location of its principal office as changed. For the purposes of this chapter, the post-office address of an existing cooperative becoming subject to this chapter, as set forth in the articles for its business office, shall be considered its registered office and the secretary of the cooperative shall be considered its registered agent unless the articles are amended otherwise.

The board may establish a registered agent as provided in chapter 10-01.1 by causing a statement in writing to be filed as an amendment to the articles as provided in section 10-15-53. Such statement shall set forth:

The name of the cooperative; and

The name of the registered agent as provided in chapter 10-01.1, and if a noncommercial registered agent, the address of the registered office.

As provided in chapter 10-01.1:

The board may change:

A registered agent;

The address of a registered agent; or

The name of a registered agent.

A registered agent may resign.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1512; S.L. 1967, ch. 98, § 6; 2007, ch. 99, § 5; 2013, ch. 89, § 3.

10-15-12.1.
Change of registered office or registered agent — Change of name of registered agent. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 99, § 85.

10-15-13.
Service of process.

Any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon the cooperative or its directors may be served as provided in chapter 10-01.1.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1513; S.L. 1993, ch. 88, § 2; 2007, ch. 99, § 6.

10-15-14.
Promotion expense — Limitation.

No cooperative funds may be used, nor any stock issued, in payment of any promotion expenses in excess of ten percent of the paid-up capital stock or membership fees. No commission or expenses shall be paid on the sale of stock in excess of ten percent of the par value thereof, and the commission or expense shall be added to the selling price of the stock.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1514.

10-15-15.
Membership.

A cooperative may have one or more classes of members. Provisions for qualifications, requirements, method of acceptance, terms, conditions, termination, and other incidents of membership shall be set forth in the bylaws. Any person, including a partnership, incorporated or unincorporated association, corporation, or body politic, may become a member in accordance with the bylaws.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1515.

10-15-16.
Voting.

Except as permitted in this section, no person other than a member may vote at any member meeting.

A person who has not fully paid for membership may not vote except as expressly permitted in the bylaws. If the cooperative permits two or more persons to hold one membership, the bylaws may provide how such member vote is to be cast.

At any member meeting of a cooperative composed of individual members and member associations, each such individual member or association member shall be entitled to only one vote. In the case of a cooperative composed only of member associations, such member associations shall have only one vote, except that the articles may permit either or both:

A member association to cast additional votes not exceeding a number equal to its membership.

A cooperative whose member-patrons include other associations to base voting in whole or in part on a patronage basis.

A member owning membership stock gains no additional vote thereby.

Voting by proxy shall not be allowed in any cooperative, except the bylaws may provide for representation of members by delegates apportioned territorially. A delegate shall cast the votes to which members represented by the delegate are entitled.

An absent member may submit a signed vote if the absent member has been previously notified in writing of the exact motion or resolution upon which the vote is taken. The bylaws may limit use of signed votes.

In the absence of written notice that some person has been designated to represent a member who is other than a natural person, such member may be represented by any of its principal officers. Unless the bylaws provide otherwise, an individual may represent more than one such member, and may also vote as an individual if the individual is a member.

The bylaws may set forth provisions, not inconsistent with this chapter, relating to the methods and procedures for voting.

Whenever the articles require the vote of a greater proportion of the members than required by this chapter, the articles control.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1516.

Collateral References.

Transfer of, and voting rights in, stock of cooperative apartment association, 99 A.L.R.2d 236.

10-15-17.
Member meetings.

Unless the bylaws provide otherwise, member meetings shall be held at the principal office or such other place as the board may determine.

An annual member meeting shall be held at the time fixed in or pursuant to the bylaws. In the absence of a bylaw provision, such meeting shall be held within six months after the close of the fiscal year at the call of the president or board.

Special member meetings may be called by the president, board, or members having one-fifth of the votes entitled to be cast at such meeting.

Written notice, stating the place, day, and hour, and in case of a special member meeting the purposes for which the meeting is called, shall be given not less than ten nor more than thirty days before the meeting at the direction of the person calling the meeting.

At any meeting at which members are to be represented by delegates, notice to such members may be given by notifying such delegates and their alternates. Notice may consist of a notice to all members or may be in the form of an announcement at the meeting at which such delegates or alternates were elected.

Action without a meeting may be taken pursuant to section 10-15-28.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1517.

10-15-18.
Quorum.

A quorum at a member meeting shall be ten percent of the first one hundred members plus five percent of additional members, present in person or represented by delegates. Unless the bylaws fix a larger number of members to constitute a quorum, a quorum shall never be more than fifty members nor less than five members, or a majority of all members, whichever is smaller. Members represented by signed vote may be counted in computing a quorum only on those questions as to which the signed vote is taken. The provisions of this section shall not apply to an electric generation or transmission cooperative as provided in subsection 10 of section 10-13-03 and a quorum for such cooperative at a meeting of its membership shall be as provided in its bylaws.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1518; S.L. 1961, ch. 118, § 3.

10-15-19.
Notice — Waiver.

Whenever notice is required by this chapter to be given to any person, such notice shall be given either personally or by mail. If mailed, such notice is given when deposited in the United States mail, with postage prepaid thereon, addressed to such person at the person’s address as it appears on the records of the cooperative.

A signed waiver is equivalent to personal notice to the person so signing.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1519.

10-15-20.
Stock — Authorization, control, use, right.

A cooperative organized with capital stock may issue the amount of stock stated in its articles. The stock may be divided into two or more classes with the designations, preferences, limitations, and relative rights as stated in the articles, except that:

Stock as such has no voting power.

Stock without par value may not be authorized or issued.

The rate of dividends upon stock may not exceed eight percent of its par value for any year, and dividends may not be cumulative.

The articles may require that members own one or more shares of membership stock. Such stock shall be issued or transferred only to a person eligible to become a member and only when such person satisfies other requisites for membership. Unless restricted by the articles, stock other than membership stock may be issued or transferred to any person.

Unless the articles provide otherwise, a cooperative may acquire, recall, exchange, redeem, and reissue its own stock. Provisions in the articles and on the stock certificate may reserve to the cooperative a prior right to acquire any stock offered for sale, or a right to recall the stock of any stockholder, or both of said rights. The consideration paid for stock recalled by the cooperative shall be its par value and accrued unpaid dividends; provided, that if the book value of such stock is less than the par value, the consideration shall be such book value. The cooperative may set off obligations of the stockholder to it. If the remaining assets would be less than the aggregate amount payable to creditors and persons holding stock with preferential rights upon liquidation, no stock shall be acquired, recalled, exchanged, or redeemed for a consideration other than stock or certificates of equity interest of equal or subordinate rank.

When stock is acquired, recalled, exchanged, or redeemed by the cooperative, such stock is restored to the status of authorized but unissued stock.

Stockholders as such have no pre-emptive right to purchase additional stock.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1520; S.L. 1995, ch. 102, § 1.

Cross-References.

Registration of securities, exemption of cooperatives’ securities, see N.D.C.C. § 10-04-05.

10-15-21.
Stock certificates.

No stock certificate may be issued except upon payment of at least the par value of the stock it represents. No cooperative may issue stock or bonds except for money, labor done, or money or property actually received. All fictitious increases of stock or indebtedness are void. If payment for stock is not in money, the board shall determine the value of the consideration and the determination, if made in good faith, is conclusive.

Each certificate for stock must bear the manual or facsimile signature of a principal officer and must state:

The name of the cooperative; the number, par value, and class of the shares represented by the certificate; and whether or not it is membership stock.

Any restrictions on the issuance or transfer of the stock, including those provided by law and the articles.

If more than one class of stock is authorized, the designation of the several classes and their respective preferences, limitations, and relative rights. In lieu of the full statement, this information may be given in summary form or the certificate may state that the cooperative will, upon request, furnish the information required by this subsection.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1521; S.L. 1995, ch. 102, § 2.

10-15-22.
Stock subscriptions — Liability.

A subscription for stock of a cooperative is irrevocable for six months unless otherwise provided by the subscription agreement or unless all subscribers consent to the revocation.

A stockholder or subscriber is under no obligation to any person with respect to the stockholder’s or subscriber’s stock or subscription other than the obligation to pay to the cooperative the full consideration for which such stock was to be issued.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1522.

10-15-23.
Missing securities or records.

When a security issued by a cooperative is missing, the cooperative shall issue a duplicate security if the owner so requests and furnishes an indemnity acceptable to the cooperative.

When records showing ownership of securities or apportionment of equity interest in the assets are missing and the information therein contained is necessary to a proposed redemption of the interest, the cooperative may give notice and redeem as follows:

The cooperative shall set aside an amount equal to the value of the interests to be redeemed.

The cooperative shall give notice of such redemption to all owners of interests of which the cooperative has knowledge.

If there are interests, the ownership of which is unknown to the cooperative, it shall publish notice of the redemption at least once a month for four months both in a publication circulated among members of cooperatives in the area, if any, and in a newspaper of general circulation in the area.

Any unclaimed outstanding interest represented by the missing records may then be terminated in accordance with section 10-15-34.1.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1523; S.L. 1983, ch. 82, § 8.

10-15-24.
Liability of cooperative for wrongful transfers of its securities.

A cooperative is not liable for acting upon wrongful transfers of its securities unless it has notice that the certificate was not transferred by a proper person or has notice that the transfer was wrongful.

As used in this section:

“Proper person” means the registered owner or last prior transferee, whether or not described as fiduciary for another, or the person’s authorized agent, legal representative, or successor to the person’s interest by operation of law.

“Transfer” includes a redemption or recall of stock.

“Wrongful transfer” means a transfer which is in excess of the authorization or capacity of the transferor, or which is made in breach of the transferor’s fiduciary duty.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1524.

10-15-25.
Directors — Number, election, removal, and vacancies.

The business and affairs of a cooperative shall be managed by a board of directors. Every director shall be a member or a representative of a member who is other than a natural person. The bylaws shall prescribe any other qualifications for directors and may provide that directors be from specified territorial districts.

The number of directors shall not be less than five, provided that in a cooperative with less than fifty members, the number of directors shall not be less than three. However, the number of directors required of a cooperative association shall never be greater than the number of members of the association. Subject to such limitation, the number shall be fixed in the articles, or if the articles so provide, in the bylaws.

The directors constituting the temporary board, named in the articles, shall hold office until the first member meeting. At that meeting and thereafter, directors shall be elected by the members at a member meeting in the manner and for the terms provided in the bylaws. If the bylaws provide that directors be from specified territorial districts, the articles may limit voting for any director to members from within the territorial district from which such director is to be elected. Unless the bylaws provide otherwise, a director’s term of office shall be one year. Each director shall hold office for the term for which elected and until a successor takes office. The bylaws may permit selection of alternates to take the place of directors absent at a meeting of the board.

Unless the bylaws provide otherwise, a director may be removed upon a majority vote of all members.

Unless the bylaws provide otherwise, any vacancy existing in the board may be filled until the next annual meeting by appointment by a majority vote of the directors then in office.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1525; S.L. 1977, ch. 84, § 1.

10-15-26.
Directors — Meetings, quorum, and waiver of notice.

Meetings of the board shall be held at such place and upon such notice as is prescribed in or pursuant to the bylaws.

Unless a greater number is required in the bylaws, a majority of the directors in office shall constitute a quorum for transaction of business. Unless a greater number is required in the bylaws, an act of the majority of the directors present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the board.

A signed waiver of notice of a board meeting is equivalent to personal notice to the person so signing. Attendance at a meeting is a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when a director attends the meeting and objects thereat to the transaction of business because the meeting was not lawfully convened.

Unless the bylaws provide otherwise, the purposes of any meeting of the board need not be specified in the notice or waiver of notice of such meeting.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1526.

10-15-27.
Executive committee.

If the bylaws so provide, the board may elect an executive committee to consist of three or more directors. When the board is not in session, such committee shall have all powers of the board except in respect to:

Powers reserved by the board to itself.

Apportionment or distribution of proceeds.

Election of officers.

Filling of vacancies in the board.

Amendments to the bylaws.

The board may elect other directors as alternates for members of the executive committee.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1527.